Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1051.
do enact as follows:AB1051,11Section 1. 93.36 of the statutes is created to read:AB1051,2,3293.36 Deicer applicators registration program. (1) Definitions. In 3this section:AB1051,2,54(a) “Commercial applicator’’ means an individual who applies deicer for hire 5but does not include a municipal, state, or other government employee.AB1051,2,76(b) “Deicer’’ means any substance used to melt snow and ice or for its anti-7icing effects on privately owned surfaces traveled by pedestrians and vehicles.AB1051,2,108(c) “Owner” means a person that owns or leases private real estate and that 9enters into a written contract with a registered commercial applicator for snow and 10ice removal and deicer application.AB1051,2,1211(d) “Registered commercial applicator” means a commercial applicator who is 12registered by the department under sub. (2) (b).AB1051,2,1813(2) Voluntary registration program. (a) The department shall create a 14deicer applicators registration program and establish criteria for training 15commercial applicators in methods for snow and ice removal and deicer application 16that protect water quality. The department shall certify 3rd-party providers of 17training that meets the criteria established by the department under this 18paragraph and shall maintain a list of registered training providers.AB1051,2,2219(b) The department shall register a commercial applicator if the commercial 20applicator successfully completes a training program approved by the department 21under par. (a) and passes an examination approved by the department. A 22registration under this paragraph shall be valid for 5 years.AB1051,3,21(c) The department shall maintain and publish a list of registered commercial 2applicators on the department’s website.AB1051,3,93(3) Liability. (a) 1. A registered commercial applicator or an owner is 4presumed to not be liable for damages arising from a hazard resulting from the 5accumulation of snow and ice on any private real estate maintained by the 6registered commercial applicator when the hazard is caused solely by snow or ice 7and the registered commercial applicator used methods for snow and ice removal 8and deicer application that are taught in a training program approved by the 9department under sub. (2) (a).AB1051,3,14102. Except as otherwise stipulated or ordered by a court, a registered 11commercial applicator seeking to demonstrate that they are not liable under subd. 121. shall, without awaiting a discovery request, provide to the other parties a copy of 13the registered commercial applicator’s unexpired registration issued by the 14department and evidence of passing the examination approved by the department.AB1051,3,18153. With respect to a commercial applicator that is not registered by the 16department under sub. (2) (b), any evidence related to the program under this 17section is inadmissible for any purpose in any judicial, legislative, or administrative 18action, proceeding, or hearing. AB1051,3,2119(b) Nothing in par. (a) limits the liability of a registered commercial applicator 20or an owner if the registered commercial applicator or owner does any of the 21following:AB1051,3,24221. Commits an act or omission that involves reckless or wanton conduct or 23intentional misconduct and the act or omission proximately causes injury, damage, 24or death.AB1051,4,212. Intentionally injures an entrant onto real estate of the owner that is 2maintained by the registered commercial applicator.AB1051,4,433. Fails to use methods for snow and ice removal and deicer application that 4are taught in a training program approved by the department under sub. (2) (a).AB1051,4,65(c) This subsection does not apply to a commercial applicator who is not 6registered under this section.AB1051,4,87(4) Record keeping. A registered commercial applicator shall maintain all 8of the following records:AB1051,4,109(a) A copy of the registered commercial applicator’s registration that is issued 10by the department.AB1051,4,1111(b) Evidence of passing the examination approved by the department.AB1051,4,1712(c) A written record describing the road, parking lot, and property 13maintenance practices the registered commercial applicator used. The record shall 14include the types and amounts of deicers used, the dates of treatment, and the 15weather conditions for each event requiring deicer application. The registered 16commercial applicator shall maintain records under this paragraph for not less 17than 3 years.AB1051,4,1818(d) Proof of compliance with the reporting requirements under sub. (5).AB1051,4,2119(5) Reporting. No later than July 1 of each year, a registered commercial 20applicator shall submit to the department on a form provided by the department 21the types and amounts of deicers he or she used in the previous calendar year.AB1051,5,522(6) Revocation of registration. If the department determines that a 23registered commercial applicator has failed to comply with this section or rules 1promulgated under this section, the department may revoke the registration of the 2registered commercial applicator. Any individual who receives notice that his or her 3registration has been revoked under this subsection is entitled to a contested case 4hearing under ch. 227 if the individual requests the hearing no later than 30 days 5after receiving the notice that his or her registration has been revoked.AB1051,5,66